Maryland, session 2026, HB1639.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
7–302.
(e) (4) (i) Except as provided in paragraphs (5) and (6) of this subsection,
from the fines collected by a political subdivision as a result of violations enforced by speed
monitoring systems, work zone speed control systems, stop sign monitoring systems, school
bus monitoring cameras, bus lane monitoring systems, or noise abatement monitoring
systems, a political subdivision:
1. May recover the costs of implementing and administering
the speed monitoring systems, work zone speed control systems, stop sign monitoring
systems, school bus monitoring cameras, bus lane monitoring systems, or noise abatement
monitoring systems; and
2. Subject to subparagraphs (ii), (iii), and (iv) of this
paragraph, may spend any remaining balance solely for public safety purposes, including
pedestrian or highway safety programs.
(VIII) FROM THE FINES COLLECTED BY THE TOWN OF FOREST
HEIGHTS AS A RESULT OF VIOLATIONS ENFORCED BY SPEED MONITORING SYSTEMS
PLACED IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 21–809(B)(1)(XIII) OF THE TRANSPORTATION
ARTICLE, ANY BALANCE REMAINING AFTER THE ALLOCATION OF FINES UNDER
SUBPARAGRAPH (I)1 OF THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL BE USED FOR PUBLIC SAFETY
PURPOSES, HIGHWAY IMPROVEMENTS, AND TRAFFIC–CALMING MEASURES IN
FOREST HEIGHTS.
Article – Transportation
21–809.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.

HOUSE BILL 1639 3
(9) “Speed monitoring system” means a device with one or more motor
vehicle sensors producing recorded images of motor vehicles traveling at speeds at least 12
miles per hour above the posted speed limit.
(b) (1) (i) 1. A speed monitoring system may not be used by a local
jurisdiction under this section unless its use is authorized by the governing body of the local
jurisdiction by local law enacted after reasonable notice and a public hearing.
(vi) This section applies to a violation of this subtitle recorded by a
speed monitoring system that meets the requirements of this subsection and has been
placed:
3. In Prince George’s County:
A. Subject to [subparagraph (vii)1] SUBPARAGRAPHS
(VII)1 AND (XIII) of this paragraph, on Maryland Route 210 (Indian Head Highway); or
(vii) 1. Not more than [six] EIGHT mobile or stationary speed
monitoring systems may be placed on Maryland Route 210 (Indian Head Highway).
(XIII) THE TOWN OF FOREST HEIGHTS MAY PLACE TWO SPEED
MONITORING SYSTEMS ON MARYLAND ROUTE 210 (INDIAN HEAD HIGHWAY)
BETWEEN THE INTERSTATE 95/495 INTERCHANGE AND THE INTERSECTION OF
KERBY HILL ROAD AND LIVINGSTON ROAD.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.